lexc/verb/enhuigec.lexc
LEXICON AddInfget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                 Caseoe;

! AddVerboeget AddVerboe case-it használja


LEXICON AddVerboetget
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoetget;

LEXICON Repoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoetget;
                    Imper1oetget;

LEXICON Imperoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoetget;
                      Nrepoetget2;
LEXICON Imper1oetget
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoetget;
                      Nrep1oetget;

LEXICON Nrepoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoetget;
                      NImperoetget2;
LEXICON Nrepoetget2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoetget;
                      NImperoetget2;

LEXICON Nrep1oetget
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoetget;
                      NImper1oetget;

LEXICON NImperoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoetget;
                      Potoetget2;
LEXICON NImperoetget2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoetget;
                      Potoetget2;

LEXICON NImper1oetget
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Potoetget;
                      Pot1oetget;

LEXICON Potoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoetget;
             Caseoe;
LEXICON Potoetget2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoetget;
             Caseoe;

LEXICON Pot1oetget
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoetget;
             Case1oe; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInfoetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Caseoe;

! AddVerboetget AddVerboe case-it használja

LEXICON AddVerboe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoe;

LEXICON Repoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imperoe;
+Rep:^+cRep^§igeo§g§AA§t  Imperoe;
                    Imper1oe;

LEXICON Imperoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrepoe2;
LEXICON Imper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrep1oe;

LEXICON Nrepoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;
LEXICON Nrepoe2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;

LEXICON Nrep1oe
+Rep:^+cNrep^§igeo§g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImper1oe;

LEXICON NImperoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;
LEXICON NImperoe2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;

LEXICON NImper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Pot1oe;

LEXICON Potoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Caseoe;
LEXICON Potoe2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Caseoe;

LEXICON Pot1oe
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Case1oe; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInfoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                Caseoe;

LEXICON Verb
biccent AddVerboe;
billent AddVerboe;
bont AddVerboe;
bosszant AddVerboe;
buggyant AddVerboe;
bánt AddVerboe;
böffent AddVerboe;
csappant AddVerboe;
csattant AddVerboe;
cseppent AddVerboe;
csettint AddVerboe;
csiccsent AddVerboe;
csillant AddVerboe;
csippent AddVerboe;
csökkent AddVerboe;
csöppent AddVerboe;
csörrent AddVerboe;
csüccsent AddVerboe;
cuppant AddVerboe;
dobbant AddVerboe;
durrant AddVerboe;
döbbent AddVerboe;
dönt AddVerboe;
egyetért AddVerboe;
emelint AddVerboe;
feccsent AddVerboe;
firkant AddVerboe;
freccsent AddVerboe;
félreért AddVerboe;
füllent AddVerboe;
füttyent AddVerboe;
gyárt AddVerboe;
hessent AddVerboe;
hint AddVerboe;
horkant AddVerboe;
hökkent AddVerboe;
hörpent AddVerboe;
hörpint AddVerboe;
int AddVerboe;
jelent AddVerboe;
kaffant AddVerboe;
karbantart AddVerboe;
kattant AddVerboe;
kettyent AddVerboe;
kettyint AddVerboe;
koccant AddVerboe;
koppant AddVerboe;
kortyant AddVerboe;
kottyant AddVerboe;
kukkant AddVerboe;
kurjant AddVerboe;
kísért AddVerboe;
köhent AddVerboe;
köhint AddVerboe;
lebbent AddVerboe;
legyint AddVerboe;
libbent AddVerboe;
lobbant AddVerboe;
loccsant AddVerboe;
lottyant AddVerboe;
löttyent AddVerboe;
löttyint AddVerboe;
ment AddVerboe;
márt AddVerboe;
nyiffant AddVerboe;
nyisszant AddVerboe;
nyisszent AddVerboe;
ont AddVerboe;
orront AddVerboe;
pattant AddVerboe;
pettyent AddVerboe;
pillant AddVerboe;
pislant AddVerboe;
pottyant AddVerboe;
prüsszent AddVerboe;
puffant AddVerboe;
pukkant AddVerboe;
pusszant AddVerboe;
pöccent AddVerboe;
pöccint AddVerboe;
pöffent AddVerboe;
pöttyent AddVerboe;
reccsent AddVerboe;
rettent AddVerboe;
rezzent AddVerboe;
rikkant AddVerboe;
rittyent AddVerboe;
robbant AddVerboe;
ront AddVerboe;
roppant AddVerboe;
ránt AddVerboe;
sercent AddVerboe;
sercint AddVerboe;
serkent AddVerboe;
suttyant AddVerboe;
szellent AddVerboe;
szeppent AddVerboe;
szippant AddVerboe;
szusszant AddVerboe;
szánt AddVerboe;
sért AddVerboe;
tart AddVerboe;
tekint AddVerboetget;
toppant AddVerboe;
tüsszent AddVerboe;
vakkant AddVerboe;
villant AddVerboe;
zökkent AddVerboe;
zörrent AddVerboe;
árt AddVerboe;
érint AddVerboe;
ért AddVerboe;
önt AddVerboe;
